Hawaii statutes.
§52D-3.5 Reports to legislature. (a)
The chief of each county police department shall submit to the legislature
no later than January 31 of each year an annual report of misconduct incidents
that resulted in suspension or discharge of a police officer. The reporting
period of each report shall be from January 1 to December 31 of the year
immediately prior to the year of the report submission.

(b) The report shall:

(1) Summarize the facts and the nature of the
misconduct for each incident;

(2) Specify the disciplinary action imposed for each
incident;

(3) Identify any other incident in the annual report
committed by the same police officer; and

(4) State whether the highest nonjudicial grievance
adjustment procedure timely invoked by the police officer or the police
officer's representative has concluded:

(A) If the highest nonjudicial grievance
adjustment procedure has concluded, the report shall state:

(i) Whether the incident concerns conduct
punishable as a crime, and if so, describe the county police department's
findings of fact and conclusions of law concerning the criminal conduct; and

(ii) Whether the county police department
notified the respective county prosecuting attorney of the incident; or

(B) If the highest nonjudicial grievance
adjustment procedure has not concluded, the report shall state the current
stage of the nonjudicial grievance adjustment procedure as of the end of the
reporting period.

(c) The report shall tabulate the number of
police officers suspended and discharged under the following categories of the
department's Standards of Conduct:

(1) Malicious use of physical force;

(2) Mistreatment of prisoners;

(3) Use of drugs and narcotics; and

(4) Cowardice.

(d) The summary of facts provided in
accordance with subsection (b)(1) shall not be of such a nature so as to
disclose the identity of the individuals involved.

(e) For any misconduct incident reported
pursuant to this section and subject to subsection (b)(4)(B), the chief of each
county police department shall provide updated information in each successive
annual report, until the highest nonjudicial grievance adjustment procedure
timely invoked by the police officer has concluded. In each successive annual
report, the updated information shall reference where the incident appeared in
the prior annual report. For any incident resolved without disciplinary action
after the conclusion of the nonjudicial grievance adjustment procedure, the
chief of each county police department shall summarize the basis for not
imposing disciplinary action.

(f) For each misconduct incident reported in
an annual report, the chief of each county police department shall retain the
disciplinary records in accordance with the department's record retention
policy or for at least eighteen months after the final annual report concerning
that incident, whichever period is longer. [L 1995, c 242, §3; am L 2014, c
121, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next